Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.537

IMPACT center—Duties.

The IMPACT center shall:

(1) Coordinate the teaching, research, and extension expertise of the college of agriculture and home economics at Washington State University to assist in:

(a) The design and development of information and strategies to expand the long-term international markets for Washington agricultural products; and

(b) The dissemination of such information and strategies to Washington exporters, overseas users, and public and private trade organizations;

(2) Research and identify current impediments to increased exports of Washington agricultural products, and determine methods of surmounting those impediments and opportunities for exporting new agricultural products and commodities to foreign markets;

(3) Prepare curricula to present and distribute information concerning international trade in agricultural commodities and products to students, exporters, international traders, and the public;

(4) Provide high quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree training in international trade in agricultural commodities in cooperation with other existing programs;

(5) Ensure that activities of the center adequately reflect the objectives for the state's agricultural market development programs established by the department of agriculture as the lead state agency for such programs under chapter 43.23 RCW; and

(6) Link itself through cooperative agreements with the center for international trade in forest products at the University of Washington, the state department of agriculture, the department of commerce, Washington's agriculture businesses and associations, and other state agency data collection, processing, and dissemination efforts.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2007; 1998 c 245 s 20; 1995 c 399 s 28. Prior: 1987 c 505 s 14; 1987 c 195 s 3; 1985 c 39 s 2; 1984 c 57 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—1985 c 39: See note following RCW 28B.30.535.